District of Columbia statutes.
26-1332

Copy of certificate as evidence.

A copy of any certificate of incorporation filed in pursuance of this chapter, certified by the Recorder of Deeds to be a true copy and the whole of such certificate, shall be received in all courts and places as presumptive legal evidence of the facts therein stated.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1309, ch. 854, § 744
1981 Ed., § 26-432.
1973 Ed., § 26-332.